District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.02

Responsibilities regarding storage of firearms.

(a)

It shall be the policy of the District of Columbia that each registrant should keep any firearm in his or her possession unloaded and either disassembled or secured by a trigger lock, gun safe, locked box, or other secure device.

(b)

No person shall store or keep any firearm on any premises under his control if he knows or reasonably should know that a minor is likely to gain access to the firearm without the permission of the parent or guardian of the minor unless such person:

(1)

Keeps the firearm in a securely locked box, secured container, or in a location which a reasonable person would believe to be secure; or

(2)

Carries the firearm on his person or within such close proximity that he can readily retrieve and use it as if he carried it on his person.

(c)

(1)

A person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of criminally negligent storage of a firearm and, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, shall be fined not more than $1,000, imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both.

(2)

A person who violates subsection (b) of this section and the minor causes injury or death to himself or another shall be fined not more than $5,000, imprisoned not more than 5 years, or both.

(3)

The provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall not apply if the minor obtains the firearm as a result of an unlawful entry or burglary to any premises by any person.

(c-1)

The provisions of § 7-2507.06 shall not apply to this section.

(d)

For the purposes of this section, the term “minor” shall mean a person under the age of 18 years.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 702, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(o), 56 DCR 1365
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(o), 59 DCR 5691

History

This section is referenced in § 7-2502.03 and § 7-2507.06.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 6-2372.
1973 Ed., § 6-1872.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-372 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Except for law enforcement personnel described in § 7-2502.01(b)(1), each registrant shall keep any firearm in his possession unloaded and disassembled or bound by a trigger lock or similar device unless such firearm is kept at his place of business, or while being used for lawful recreational purposes within the District of Columbia.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 added “penalties” in the section heading; and added (c-1).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 2(c) of Firearms Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-422, July 16, 2008, 55 DCR 8237).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Second Firearms Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-502, September 16, 2008, 55 DCR 9904).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of D.C. Act 17-422, see § 5 of Second Firearms Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-502, September 16, 2008, 55 DCR 9904).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2(e) and 4 of Second Firearms Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-601, December 12, 2008, 56 DCR 9).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(o) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary addition of (c-1) and amendment of section heading, see § 2(o) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).

Emergency Legislation